Arkansas, session 2025, HB1210.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 19-5-914(c), concerning disbursement or
transfer of moneys in the Judges Retirement Fund, is amended to read as
follows:
(c)(1) The Judges Retirement Fund shall be disbursed or transferred as
provided by law for:
(A) The benefit of retirants and for investment;
(B) Investment purposes; and
(C) The costs of administering the Arkansas Judicial
Retirement System.
(2) Moneys shall be transferred from the Judges Retirement Fund
to the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System for administration and
management of the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System as authorized by law.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 19-5-917(c), concerning disbursement or
*LJH053*
01/23/2025 9:55:58 AM LJH053

HB1210
transfer of moneys in the State Police Retirement Fund, is amended to read as
follows:
(c)(1) The State Police Retirement Fund shall be used for payment of
personal services, operating expenses, investments, benefits, refunds, and
for such other purposes as may be authorized by law and in § 24-6-201 et seq.
(2) Moneys shall be transferred from the State Police Retirement
Fund to the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System for administration
and management of the State Police Retirement System as authorized by law.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 24-8-204(c), concerning authorization by
the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System for the
payment of expenses related to administering the Arkansas Judicial Retirement
System, is amended to read as follows:
(c) All costs of administering the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System
shall be paid from the Judges Retirement Fund, but no payment for such
expenses shall be made unless authorized by the board.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code Title 24, Chapter 4, Subchapter 2, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
24-4-214. Transfers for administrative functions of Arkansas Public
Employees' Retirement System.
(a)(1) Beginning July 1, 2027, and thereafter, a sum shall be
transferred each fiscal year from the Judges Retirement Fund to the Arkansas
Public Employees' Retirement System as necessary for costs incurred by the
Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System in administering the Arkansas
Judicial Retirement System.
(2) The sum to be transferred shall be the percentage of the
Arkansas Public Employees’ Retirement System’s total cost of administration
calculated using a 50/50 weighted average of the Arkansas Judicial Retirement
System’s pro-rata percentage of total invested assets and pro-rata percentage
of total membership.
(3) The transfer request shall be made to the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State, and upon his or her approval, the transfer shall be
made on the books of the:
(A) Chief Fiscal Officer of the State;
(B) The Treasurer of State; and
01/23/2025 9:55:58 AM LJH053

HB1210
(C) The Auditor of State.
(b)(1) Beginning July 1, 2027, and thereafter, a sum shall be
transferred each fiscal year from the State Police Retirement Fund to the
Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System as necessary for costs incurred
by the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System in administering the
State Police Retirement System.
(2) The sum to be transferred shall be the percentage of the
Arkansas Public Employees’ Retirement System’s total cost of administration
calculated using a 50/50 weighted average of the State Police Retirement
System’s pro-rata percentage of total invested assets and pro-rata percentage
of total membership.
(3) The transfer request shall be made to the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State, and upon his or her approval, the transfer shall be
made on the books of the:
(A) Chief Fiscal Officer of the State;
(B) The Treasurer of State; and
(C) The Auditor of State.
(c) As used in this section:
(1) “Total invested assets” means the combined value of the
investment assets of the Arkansas Public Employees’ Retirement System, the
Arkansas Judicial Retirement System, and the State Police Retirement System
at the end of each fiscal year; and
(2) “Total membership” means the combined number of active,
inactive, and retired members covered by the Arkansas Public Employees’
Retirement System, the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System, and the State
Police Retirement System at the end of each fiscal year.










01/23/2025 9:55:58 AM LJH053